tables/en-g3.ctb
# S
nocross begmidword sa 234
nocross midword se 234
nocross endword se 156
nocross midendword seful 156-124-123
nocross midendword sefully 156-124-456-13456
nocross midendword sefulness 156-124-123-56-234
nocross midendword seless 156-46-234
nocross midendword sely 156-45
nocross midendword selessness 156-46-234-56-234
nocross midendword sement 156-56-2345
nocross midendword seness 156-56-234
nocross partword sh 146
nocross begmidword sha 146
nocross midword she 146
nocross midword shi 146
nocross midword sho 146
nocross midword shu 146
nocross midword si 234
nocross midendword sion 46-1345
nocross midword siona 46-1345
nocross midword sioni 46-1345
nocross midword so 234
nocross begmidword sp 126
nocross begmidword spa 126
nocross midword spe 126
nocross midword spi 126
nocross midword spo 126
nocross midword spu 126
nocross midendword ss 46
nocross midword ssa 46
nocross midword sse 46
nocross midword ssi 46
nocross midword sso 46
nocross midword ssu 46
nocross partword st 34
nocross begmidword sta 34
nocross midword ste 34
nocross midword sti 34
nocross midword sto 34
nocross midword stu 34
nocross midword su 234

# T
nocross begmidword ta 2345
endword te 356
midendword ted 2345-1246
nocross endword tely 356-45
nocross midendword teness 356-56-234
nocross midendword tement 356-56-2345
endword tes 2345-1356
nocross partword th 1456
nocross begmidword tha 1456
nocross midword thi 1456
nocross partword thir 1456-1235
nocross midword tho 1456
nocross midword thu 1456
nocross midword ti 2345
nocross midendword tion 56-1345
nocross midword tiona 56-1345
nocross midword tioni 56-1345
nocross midword to 2345
nocross midword tt 356
nocross midword tta 356
nocross midword tte 356
nocross midword tti 356
nocross midword tto 356
nocross midword ttu 356
nocross midword tu 2345
nocross midendword ty 56

# U
nocross midword ua 56
nocross midword ue 56
nocross midword ui 56
nocross begword un 2349-346
nocross begword una 2349-346
nocross begword une 2349-346
nocross begword uni 2349-346
nocross begword uno 2349-346
nocross begword unu 2349-346
word uni 2349-136-1345-24
begword unic 2349-136-1345-24-14
begword unich 2349-136-1345-24-16
begword unidd 2349-136-1345-24-256
begword unif 2349-136-1345-24-124
begword uniff 2349-136-1345-24-235
begword unifor 2349-136-1345-24-123456
begword unig 2349-136-1345-24-1245
begword unigh 2349-136-1345-24-126
begword unih 2349-136-1345-24-125
begword unil 2349-136-1345-24-123
begword unill 2349-346-24-456
begword unio 2349-136-1345-6
begword unip 2349-136-1345-24-1234
begword unipp 2349-136-1345-24-36
begword unir 2349-136-1345-24-1235
begword unirr 2349-136-1345-24-236
begword unis 2349-136-1345-24-234
begword unish 2349-136-1345-24-146
begword unisp 2349-136-1345-24-126
begword uniss 2349-136-1345-24-46
word unit 2349-136-1345-24-2345
begword unit 2349-136-1345-24-2345
word unite 2349-136-1345-356
word unity 2349-136-1345-56
begword unith 2349-136-1345-24-1456
begword unithe 2349-136-1345-24-2346
begword univ 2349-136-1345-24-1236
midword uo 56
nocross endword ure 136
nocross endword urely 136-45
nocross midword uu 56
nocross midword uy 56

# V
nocross begmidword va 1236
nocross midendword ve 1236
endword 've 3-1236
nocross midword vi 1236
nocross midword vo 1236
nocross midword vu 1236

# W
nocross begmidword wa 2456
nocross midendword ward 2456
nocross midword we 2456
nocross begmidword wh 156
nocross begmidword wha 156
nocross midword whe 156
nocross midword whi 156
nocross midword who 156
nocross midword whu 156
nocross midword wi 2456
nocross midword wo 2456
nocross midword wu 2456

# X
nocross midword xe 1346
nocross midword xi 1346

# Z
nocross begmidword za 1356
nocross midendword ze 156
nocross midword zi 1356
nocross midword zo 1356
nocross midword zu 1356

### exceptions
word for\sthat 29-123456-0-2345-19
word for\sthis 29-123456-0-1456-19
word for\smore 29-123456-0-134-19
joinword it\schange 9-1346-0-4-16-1249
word it\schange 9-1346-0-4-16-1249
nocross always it\schange 9-1346-0-349-4-16
word it\stend 9-1346-0-2345-26-145
nocross begword it\stend 9-1346-0-2345-26-145
word make-up 134-13-15-36-136-1234
word near\sor 249-45-1345-0-346-19
word next\sor 249-4-1345-0-346-19
word one\sfrom 249-5-135-0-124-19
word part\sor 249-5-1234-0-346-19
word please\sdo 249-45-1234-0-145-19
word right\sfully 249-5-1235-1249-0-124-136-456-13456
word time\sor 249-5-2345-0-346-19
word well\sor 249-456-12456-0-346-19
word exchange 12349-1346-349-4-16
nocross begword exchange 12349-1346-349-4-16

always  \s\x2013\s 36-36 # 8211  en dash
always \s\x2014\s 36-36 # em dash
# nobreak 6-46-56-e,6-46-56

# Problems handled with context
# noback context $U2-20[]"'"$l @6-3
noback context _$l["."]$l @256 U.S.
noback context _$d["a"] @56-1
noback context _$d["A"] @56-1

# problems handled with multipass opcodes

# remove dummy caps
noback pass2 @6f-3 ?
noback pass2 @6f ?

noback pass2 @36-36-36 @36-36
noback pass2 @6-236-3456 @3-3456
#corrects Capital A's after a number ending up with letter sign AFTER Caps sign
# noback pass2 @6-56 @56-6 conflicts with "iety"
# Remove space between word and italic signs
#noback pass2 @0-46-3   @46@3
#noback pass2 @46@0   @46

# Connect one-celled word sign with large sign
noback pass2 @19-0-29 ?

# Lower2 words normally retain the following space.

# Lower3 signs may join "the".
noback pass2 @149-0-29 ?

# to/into/by may be joined only by lower word signs.
# Lower1 and Lower3 signs retain their existing linking behavior.
noback pass2 @139-49 ?
noback pass2 @139-0-49 ?
noback pass2 @59-49 ?
noback pass2 @59-0-49 ?
noback pass2 @149-49 ?
noback pass2 @149-0-49 ?

# "in" and "come" may join to/into/by.
noback pass2 @35[@1239-49] ?
noback pass2 @35[@1239-0-49] ?
noback pass2 @36[@1239-49] ?
noback pass2 @36[@1239-0-49] ?

# "enough" always retains the following space.

noback pass2 %wordsignClose@49 @0

# be/con/dis may only be joined by "the" or a lower sign
noback pass2 @2346-129-1349 @2346

# Lower1 and Lower3 signs may join be/com/con/dis prefixes.
noback pass2 @139-1349 ?
noback pass2 @139-0-1349 ?
noback pass2 @59-1349 ?
noback pass2 @59-0-1349 ?
noback pass2 @149-1349 ?
noback pass2 @149-0-1349 ?

# "come" does not join be/con/dis prefixes; its space is retained here.
# It still joins to/into/by through the Lower# rules above.

# "enough" always retains the following space.

noback pass2 %marker@1349 @0

# Handle sequences starting with lower1 (am/be/is...)
noback pass2 @0-39-2[@139-9]@24 ?
noback pass2 `@39-2[@139-9]@24 ?
noback pass2 @0-39$d[@139]$lpmS @0
noback pass2 `@39$d[@139]$lpmS @0

# "was a" may not start a sequence.
noback pass2 @0-39-356[@139-9]@1-19 @0
noback pass2 `@39-356[@139-9]@1-19 @0

# "was", "were" and "by" may not end a sequence
noback pass2 $lpmdS[@39]@356-139-0 @0
noback pass2 $lpmdS[@39]@356-139~ @0
noback pass2 $lpmdS[@39]@2356-139-0 @0
noback pass2 $lpmdS[@39]@2356-139~ @0

# Keep space before and after "O" etc.
noback pass2 %marker@12349 @0
noback pass2 @12349%marker @0

# No sequencing before letsign
noback pass2 %marker[@56f] @0-56
noback pass2 @56f @56

# Remove left-over markers

# Space omission after Two-cell word pass-throughs
# Preserve the following space before Lower2 words (in/enough/come), lower be-/com-/con-/dis- prefixes, and the 12349 keep-away marker for every sign in this section.
# When two-cell words have preceeding letters like react, space is omitted before the next word and retained if followed by a number.

# act
noback pass2 @349-4-1-0-1349-23 @349-4-1-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-4-1-0-2349-36 @349-4-1-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-4-1-0-1349-25 @349-4-1-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-4-1-0-1349-256 @349-4-1-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-4-1-0-12349 @349-4-1-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-4-1-0-239 @349-4-1-0-239
noback pass2 @349-4-1-0 @349-4-1
noback pass2 @349-4-1-0-3456 @349-4-1-0-3456

# allow
noback pass2 @349-456-246-0-1349-23 @349-456-246-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-456-246-0-2349-36 @349-456-246-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-456-246-0-1349-25 @349-456-246-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-456-246-0-1349-256 @349-456-246-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-456-246-0-12349 @349-456-246-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-456-246-0-239 @349-456-246-0-239
noback pass2 @349-456-246-0 @349-456-246
noback pass2 @349-456-246-0-3456 @349-456-246-0-3456

# ally
# Normally join after this outlined ending, but retain the space before lower be-/com-/con-/dis-.
noback pass2 @6-13456-0-1349-23 @6-13456-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @6-13456-0-2349-36 @6-13456-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @6-13456-0-1349-25 @6-13456-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @6-13456-0-1349-256 @6-13456-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @6-13456-0-12349 @6-13456-0-12349
noback pass2 @6-13456-0-239 @6-13456-0-239
noback pass2 @6-13456-0 @6-13456
noback pass2 @6-13456-0-3456 @6-13456-0-3456

# ance
# Normally join after this outlined ending, but retain the space before lower be-/com-/con-/dis-.
noback pass2 @46-15-0-1349-23 @46-15-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @46-15-0-2349-36 @46-15-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @46-15-0-1349-25 @46-15-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @46-15-0-1349-256 @46-15-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @46-15-0-12349 @46-15-0-12349
noback pass2 @46-15-0-239 @46-15-0-239
noback pass2 @46-15-0 @46-15
noback pass2 @46-15-0-3456 @46-15-0-3456

# ances
# Normally join after this outlined ending, but retain the space before lower be-/com-/con-/dis-.
noback pass2 @46-1356-0-1349-23 @46-1356-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @46-1356-0-2349-36 @46-1356-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @46-1356-0-1349-25 @46-1356-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @46-1356-0-1349-256 @46-1356-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @46-1356-0-12349 @46-1356-0-12349
noback pass2 @46-1356-0-239 @46-1356-0-239
noback pass2 @46-1356-0 @46-1356
noback pass2 @46-1356-0-3456 @46-1356-0-3456

# appear
noback pass2 @349-45-1-0-1349-23 @349-45-1-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-45-1-0-2349-36 @349-45-1-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-45-1-0-1349-25 @349-45-1-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-45-1-0-1349-256 @349-45-1-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-45-1-0-12349 @349-45-1-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-45-1-0-239 @349-45-1-0-239
noback pass2 @349-45-1-0 @349-45-1
noback pass2 @349-45-1-0-3456 @349-45-1-0-3456

# ation
# Normally join after this outlined ending, but retain the space before lower be-/com-/con-/dis-.
noback pass2 @6-1345-0-1349-23 @6-1345-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @6-1345-0-2349-36 @6-1345-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @6-1345-0-1349-25 @6-1345-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @6-1345-0-1349-256 @6-1345-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @6-1345-0-12349 @6-1345-0-12349
noback pass2 @6-1345-0-239 @6-1345-0-239
noback pass2 @6-1345-0 @6-1345
noback pass2 @6-1345-0-3456 @6-1345-0-3456

# bly
# Normally join after this outlined ending, but retain the space before lower be-/com-/con-/dis-.
noback pass2 @46-13456-0-1349-23 @46-13456-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @46-13456-0-2349-36 @46-13456-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @46-13456-0-1349-25 @46-13456-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @46-13456-0-1349-256 @46-13456-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @46-13456-0-12349 @46-13456-0-12349
noback pass2 @46-13456-0-239 @46-13456-0-239
noback pass2 @46-13456-0 @46-13456
noback pass2 @46-13456-0-3456 @46-13456-0-3456

# came
noback pass2 @349-456-36-0-1349-23 @349-456-36-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-456-36-0-2349-36 @349-456-36-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-456-36-0-1349-25 @349-456-36-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-456-36-0-1349-256 @349-456-36-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-456-36-0-12349 @349-456-36-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-456-36-0-239 @349-456-36-0-239
noback pass2 @349-456-36-0 @349-456-36
noback pass2 @349-456-36-0-3456 @349-456-36-0-3456

# change
noback pass2 @349-4-16-0-1349-23 @349-4-16-0-1349-23
noback pass2 @349-4-16-0-2349-36 @349-4-16-0-2349-36
noback pass2 @349-4-16-0-1349-25 @349-4-16-0-1349-25
noback pass2 @349-4-16-0-1349-256 @349-4-16-0-1349-256
noback pass2 @349-4-16-0-12349 @349-4-16-0-12349
noback pass2 @349-4-16-0-239 @349-4-16-0-239
noback pass2 @349-4-16-0 @349-4-16
noback pass2 @349-4-16-0-3456 @349-4-16-0-3456
